src/fst/morphology/affixes/possessives.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

! ========================================================================== !
!                      Lule Sámi morphological analyser                      !
! ========================================================================== !


! Sublexica for possessive suffixes
! =================================

LEXICON PxV      ! This intermezzo of a lexicon due to vowel alternations in the possessive suffixes in E- and O-stem nouns (e-á, o-u)
 :X4 PxV12 ; 
     PxV3  ; 

LEXICON PxV-12 ! This intermediate lexicon due to the exclusion of PxV3. Sg1 and 2 are treated separately due to the aforementioned vowel alternations.
 :X4 PxV12 ; 

LEXICON PxV12    ! Due to incoming Acc/Gen 12 vs 3 alternation in E- and O-stem nouns (e-á, o-u)
 :X8 PxV1 ;
 :X8 PxV2 ;

LEXICON PxV23	! Due to incoming Refl pron 1 vs 23 alternation. Sg1 treated seperately in pronouns file due to special stem iehtja (sent directly to PxV1).
   PxV2 ; ! dábálasj ietja stem
   PxV3 ; ! dábálasj ietja stem

LEXICON PxNomPlV !Due to incoming NomPl (no vowel alternations: ieddne -> iednem)
   PxV1 ;
   PxV2 ;

!LEXICON PxNomPlV3 !Due to incoming NomPl 
!   PxV3 ;


LEXICON PxV1 ! Regular even/contr nom- acc
 +PxSg1:m  K-CONS ;
 +PxDu1:ma K-VOW ;
 +PxDu1+Err/Orth:me K-VOW ; !used i Anta Pirak
 +PxPl1:ma K-VOW ;
 +PxPl1+Err/Orth:me K-VOW ; !used i Anta Pirak

LEXICON PxV2 ! Regular even/contr nom - acc
 +PxSg2:t  K-CONS ;
 +PxDu2:da K-VOW ;
 +PxPl2:da K-VOW ;

LEXICON PxV3 ! Regular even/contr nom - acc
 +PxSg3:s   K-CONS ;
 +PxDu3:ska K-VOW ;
 +PxDu3+Err/Orth:ská K-VOW ;
 +PxPl3:sa  K-VOW ;

! Lexicon for the deviating -im, -it suffixes
! Non-deviating form pointed to common PxCc
! Even/contr ill sg: oabbásim, æddnásit
! Refl pron ill: iehtjasim/allasim
LEXICON PxCi
 +PxSg1:im K-CONS    ;
 +PxSg2:it K-CONS    ;
           PxCc ;

! (Lexicon for regular PxC nom,acc, gen)
! Regular odd nom-acc sg
! Regular even/contr ine-kom sg + gen-com pl - ill pl
LEXICON PxC
 +PxSg1:am K-CONS    ; ! bednagam
 +Use/NG+PxSg1:im K-CONS    ;
 +PxSg2:at K-CONS    ; ! æjgádijdasat
 +Use/NG+PxSg2:it K-CONS    ;
           PxCc ;

! (Lexicon for regular PxC ine, ela, com and pl)
! Regular odd ill-com sg + gen-com pl - ill pl
! Irregular even/contr ill. pl -eska
LEXICON PxCs
 +PxSg1:ám   K-CONS ; 
 +PxSg2:át   K-CONS ;
 +PxSg3:es   K-CONS ;
 +PxDu1:ema  K-VOW ;
 +PxDu2:eda  K-VOW ;
 +PxDu3:eska K-VOW ; ! even ill pl
 +PxDu3+Err/Orth:eská K-VOW ; ! even ill pl
 +PxPl1:ema  K-VOW ;
 +PxPl2:eda  K-VOW ;
 +PxPl3:esa  K-VOW ;

!Commom lexicon for all PxC
! Regular odd nom-acc sg + irregular ill pl
! Regular even/contr sg ine - kom
! Refl pron ine elat com
LEXICON PxCc
 +PxSg3:is    K-CONS ; ! odd nom-acc
 +PxDu1:imme  K-VOW ;
 +PxDu2:ihtte K-VOW ;
 +PxDu3:iska  K-VOW ; ! odd ill pl
 +PxDu3+Err/Orth:iská  K-VOW ; ! odd ill pl
 +PxPl1:imme  K-VOW ;
 +PxPl2:ihtte K-VOW ;
 +PxPl3:isá   K-VOW ;
